Utah statutes.
39-6-94.   Intoxicated on duty -- Sentinel or lookout.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter, other than a sentinel or lookout, who is found intoxicated on duty shall be punished as a military court directs.

(2)  A sentinel or lookout who is found intoxicated or sleeping on his post, or leaves it before he is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

